Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
PART 1 General Provisions

53-5-30.
Definitions.

For purposes of this article:

“Domiciliary jurisdiction” is the jurisdiction outside this state in which a nondomiciliary is domiciled at death.

“Foreign will” is the will of a nondomiciliary who dies while domiciled in a jurisdiction that is not a state or territory governed by the Constitution of the United States and who at death owns property located in this state or a cause of action the venue of which lies in this state.

“Nondomiciliary” is a decedent who dies while domiciled in a jurisdiction that is outside this state.

“Out-of-state will” is the will of a nondomiciliary who dies while domiciled in a state or territory that is governed by the Constitution of the United States and who at death owns property located in this state or a cause of action the venue of which lies in this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-30

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-5-31.
Requisites for admission to probate.

A foreign will or an out-of-state will may be admitted to original common or solemn form probate under the rules governing probate of wills of testators who die domiciled in this state upon proof that the will is valid under the laws of this state and that it has not been offered for probate or establishment in the domiciliary jurisdiction or that it has been offered for probate but either no timely caveat or similar objection was filed in the domiciliary jurisdiction or the grounds of a pending caveat or similar objection are not such as would, if proved, cause the denial of probate.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-31

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For comment discussing Georgia probate of will witnessed, executed, and probated in another state, in light of In re Barrie’s Estate, 240 Iowa 431, 35 N.W.2d 658 (1949), see 1 Mercer L. Rev. 135 (1949).

53-5-32.
Effect of admission to probate.

If a foreign will or an out-of-state will is admitted to original probate in common or solemn form, the terms of the will shall be given effect under the laws of this state and shall be subject to the same defenses and objections as a will of a testator who died domiciled in this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-32

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For comment discussing Georgia probate of will witnessed, executed, and probated in another state, in light of In re Barrie’s Estate, 240 Iowa 431, 35 N.W.2d 658 (1949), see 1 Mercer L. Rev. 135 (1949).

53-5-33.
Requisites for admission to ancillary probate.

A foreign will or an out-of-state will duly admitted to probate or established under the laws of the domiciliary jurisdiction may be admitted to ancillary probate in solemn form upon proof that the will has not been offered for probate in this state in proceedings in which a caveat to such probate has been finally sustained or is pending.

For purposes of ancillary probate of out-of-state wills, when the out-of-state will has been admitted to probate or established in the domiciliary jurisdiction, the will may be admitted to ancillary probate in solemn form upon production of a properly certified copy of the will and a properly authenticated copy of the final proceedings in the jurisdiction in which the will was probated or established, certified according to Code Section 24-9-922, and may be attacked or resisted on the same grounds as other judicial proceedings from a state of the United States.

For purposes of ancillary probate of a foreign will, if the foreign will has been probated or established under the laws of the domiciliary jurisdiction, a certified copy of the will and an authenticated copy of the final proceedings in the jurisdiction in which the will was probated or established, under the seal of the court, shall be prima-facie evidence of the due execution of the will and the will may be admitted to ancillary probate but may be objected to by caveat or rebutted by proof, as in the case of a will offered for original probate.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-33

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 97/HB 24.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 101/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this Act shall apply to any motion made or hearing or trial commenced on or after January 1, 2013.

Law reviews.

For article, “Evidence,” see 27 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2011).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2011).

53-5-34.
Effect of admission to ancillary probate.

If a foreign will or an out-of-state will is admitted to ancillary probate in this state, the validity and terms of the will shall be given effect under the laws of the domiciliary jurisdiction.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-34

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-5-35.
Muniments of title to realty.

Wills that are probated or established in another state shall constitute muniments of title for the transfer and conveyance of real property in this state to the beneficiaries named in the will and such will shall be admitted in evidence in this state as muniments of title without being probated in this state when:

Such a will is accompanied by properly authenticated copies of the record admitting the will to probate in another state, certified according to Code Section 24-9-922; and

The certified copy of such a will is recorded in the office of the clerk of the superior court in the county in which the real property is situated in the record in which deeds are recorded in this state.

This Code section shall apply to all cases in which real property is held or claimed under wills not probated in this state and to all actions brought to recover or protect real property in this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-35

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 98/HB 24.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 101/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this Act shall apply to any motion made or hearing or trial commenced on or after January 1, 2013.

Law reviews.

For comment discussing Georgia probate of will witnessed, executed, and probated in another state, in light of In re Barrie’s Estate, 240 Iowa 431, 35 N.W.2d 658 (1949), see 1 Mercer L. Rev. 135 (1949).

For article, “Evidence,” see 27 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2011).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2011).

53-5-36.
Jurisdiction.

The probate court of any county in this state in which is located any property owned by the decedent or any cause of action of which the decedent was possessed at death the venue of which lies in this state shall have original or ancillary jurisdiction of a foreign or out-of-state will.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-36

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-5-37.
Qualification of executor or administrator.

Upon the admission of a foreign will or an out-of-state will to ancillary probate, an executor named by or pursuant to the will to serve in this state or, in the absence of objection, a duly qualified and acting executor, administrator, or personal representative for the estate under the laws of the jurisdiction in which the will was originally probated or established shall be entitled to qualify as executor or administrator with the will annexed in this state. If such person shall fail to qualify within a reasonable time after the will is admitted to ancillary probate or if objection is filed and the probate court shall find good cause why such person should not serve, the court shall name as administrator with the will annexed a person who could otherwise be named administrator with the will annexed under the laws of this state. No person may qualify as executor or administrator with the will annexed under this Code section if such person is not otherwise qualified to act as a fiduciary in this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-37

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-5-38.
Distribution of intestate nondomiciliary’s real property.

If a nondomiciliary dies intestate owning real property located in this state, the real property shall be distributed to that decedent’s heirs in accordance with the laws of intestacy of this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-38

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-5-39.
Appointment of administrator of intestate nondomiciliary’s estate.

When a nondomiciliary dies intestate owning real property located in any county of this state, the probate court of such county, on petition of any heir, creditor, or any duly qualified administrator or personal representative of the decedent, shall appoint an administrator of the estate in this state, in conformity with the proceedings required for the appointment of an administrator of a decedent who died domiciled in this state. Unless there is objection and good cause to the contrary shown, the duly qualified administrator or personal representative shall be appointed as the administrator of the estate in this state. No person may qualify as administrator under this Code section if such person is not otherwise qualified to act as a personal representative in this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-39

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-5-40.
Notice given by ancillary personal representative.

Upon qualification, the ancillary personal representative shall give notice to all creditors of the nondomiciliary decedent who are domiciled in this state in the same manner as is required for decedents who die domiciled in this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-40

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1586, § 18.

53-5-41.
Laws or court orders governing administration of estate by ancillary personal representative.

An ancillary personal representative shall be subject to the laws of this state governing the administration of estates generally, except that by order of the probate court granted after notice to the persons known to have an interest in or claim against the estate in this state as an unsatisfied heir, beneficiary, or creditor residing in this state, the personal representative may be directed to:

Pay only those debts determined by the probate court to constitute administrative expenses or other debts incurred by the personal representative and debts payable to creditors residing or situated in this state;

Make distribution to any heirs or beneficiaries residing or situated in this state to the extent that the probate court determines to be practicable and not to the detriment of a testamentary scheme; and

If the provisions of paragraph (1) or (2) of this Code section or both paragraphs apply to the estate, distribute all property remaining in the hands of the ancillary personal representative to the personal representative qualified in the domiciliary jurisdiction rather than to the distributees of the estate.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-41

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.